Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [624.7135] SALE OF FIREARM; TRAINING IN SAFE USE REQUIRED; RECORD KEEPING; CRIMINAL PENALTY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin As used in this section: new text end new text begin (1) "firearms dealer" has the meaning given in section 624.7134; new text end new text begin (2) "sale" or "sell" includes any permanent transfer of ownership of a firearm, regardless of whether any consideration was given; new text end new text begin (3) "state or federally issued identification" has the meaning given in section 624.7134; and new text end new text begin (4) "unlicensed person" has the meaning given in section 624.7134. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sale of firearm; training required. new text end new text begin A person may not sell a firearm unless the person purchasing or otherwise taking ownership of the firearm presents evidence of training in the safe use of a firearm as provided in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Training in safe use of a firearm. new text end new text begin (a) A person purchasing or otherwise taking ownership of a firearm must present evidence to the seller that the person has received training in the safe use of a firearm within one year of the date of the sale. Training may be demonstrated by: new text end new text begin (1) employment as a peace officer in the state of Minnesota within the past year; or new text end new text begin (2) completion of a firearms safety or training course providing basic training in the safe use of a firearm and conducted by a certified instructor. new text end new text begin (b) Basic training must include: new text end new text begin (1) instruction in the fundamentals of firearm use, including firearm mechanics and operation, safe handling and storage, and injury and suicide prevention; new text end new text begin (2) successful completion of an actual shooting qualification exercise; and new text end new text begin (3) instruction in the fundamental legal aspects of firearm possession, carry, and use, including self-defense and the restrictions on the use of deadly force. new text end new text begin (c) The certified instructor must issue a certificate to a person who has completed a firearms safety or training course described in paragraph (b). The certificate must be signed and dated by the instructor and attest that the person attended and completed the course. new text end new text begin (d) A person qualifies as a certified instructor if the person is certified as a firearms instructor within the past five years by an organization or government entity that has been approved by the Department of Public Safety in accordance with the department's standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 8, this section applies to all sales of firearms regardless of whether the parties involved are firearms dealers or unlicensed persons. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Record of safety training; required information. new text end new text begin (a) All parties to a sale of a firearm must complete a record of safety training on a form designed and made publicly available without fee for this purpose by the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Each page of the record must be signed and dated by the parties and contain the serial number of the firearm. new text end new text begin (b) The record must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a clear copy of each person's current state or federally issued identification; and new text end new text begin (2) a clear copy of the firearms safety training certificate of the purchaser or person otherwise taking ownership of the firearm, or proof that the person was employed as a peace officer within the state of Minnesota within the year preceding the sale. new text end new text begin (c) In addition, the record must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the type of firearm; new text end new text begin (2) the manufacturer, make, and model of the firearm; and new text end new text begin (3) the firearm's manufacturer-assigned serial number. new text end new text begin (d) All parties to the sale must retain a copy of the record and any attachments to the record for ten years from the date of the sale. A copy in digital form shall be acceptable for the purposes of this paragraph. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Compulsory production of record of safety training; misdemeanor penalty. new text end new text begin (a) All parties to a sale of a firearm must produce the record of safety training when a peace officer requests the record as part of a criminal investigation. new text end new text begin (b) A person who refuses or is unable to produce the record in response to a request for production made by a peace officer pursuant to paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. A prosecution or conviction for violation of this subdivision is not a bar to conviction of, or punishment for, any other crime committed involving the sold firearm. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Immunity. new text end new text begin A person is immune to a charge of violating this section if the person presents a record of safety training that satisfies the requirements of subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Exclusions. new text end new text begin (a) This section shall not apply to the following: new text end new text begin (1) a sale to a firearms dealer; new text end new text begin (2) a sale to any law enforcement agency; new text end new text begin (3) a sale to an executor, administrator, trustee, or personal representative of an estate or a trust that occurs by operation of law upon the death of the former owner of the firearm; new text end new text begin (4) a sale of an antique firearm as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (5) a sale of a curio or relic, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, section 478.11, if the sale is between collectors of firearms as curios or relics as defined by United States Code, title 18, section 921(a)(13), who each have in their possession a valid collector of curio and relics license issued by the United States Department of Justice, Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; and new text end new text begin (6) a sale to or by an auctioneer who is in compliance with chapter 330 and acting in the person's official role as an auctioneer to facilitate or conduct an auction of the firearm. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Consolidated record. new text end new text begin Parties to a firearm sale under this section may use a consolidated record of transfer form designed and made publicly available without fee for this purpose by the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension that combines the record keeping requirements of both this section and section 624.7134. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to sales of firearms occurring on or after that date. new text end